Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4799.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.77, as amended by Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 10, article 3, section 17, is amended to read: 122A.77 SPECIAL EDUCATION TEACHER new text begin AND RELATED SERVICES PROVIDER new text end PATHWAY PROGRAM. Subdivision 1. Grant program established. new text begin (a) new text end The commissioner of education must administer a grant program to develop a pathway for trained, licensed Tier 3 or Tier 4 special education teachersnew text begin and related services providers under paragraph (d)new text end . A school district, charter school, Tribal contract school, or cooperative unit under section 123A.24, subdivision 2, may apply for a grant under this section. new text begin (b)new text end An applicant new text begin seeking funding for a special education teacher pathway grant new text end must partner with: (1) a Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board-approved teacher preparation program; (2) a Council for the Accreditation of Educator Preparation-accredited teacher preparation program from a private, not-for-profit, institution of higher education; or (3) an institution that has an articulated transfer pathway with a board-approved teacher preparation program. new text begin (c) An applicant seeking funding for a related services provider pathway grant must partner with a regionally accredited college or university or an appropriate preparation program in which candidates enroll to meet licensure requirements necessary for Tier 3 licensure as related services providers. new text end new text begin (d) For purposes of this section, "related services providers" means: new text end new text begin (1) school counselors; new text end new text begin (2) school nurses; new text end new text begin (3) school psychologists; new text end new text begin (4) school social workers; or new text end new text begin (5) school speech-language pathologists. new text end Subd. 2. Grant uses. (a) A grant recipient must use grant funds to support participants who are employed by the grant recipient and demonstrate a willingness to be a special education teacher new text begin or a related services provider new text end after completing the program. (b) A grant recipient may use grant funds for: (1) tuition assistance or stipends for participants; (2) supports for participants, including mentoring, licensure test preparation, and technology support; or (3) participant recruitment. Subd. 3. Grant procedure. (a) Applicants must apply for a grant under this section in the form and manner specified by the commissioner. (b) In awarding grants, the commissioner must prioritize funding for training to allow participants holding a Tier 1 or Tier 2 special education license to obtain a Tier 3 special education license. (c) To the extent that there are sufficient applications, the commissioner must, to the extent practicable, award an equal number of grants between applicants in greater Minnesota and applicants in the metropolitan area. Subd. 4. Report. Within one year of receiving grant funds, and for each year that a recipient receives grant funds, a grant recipient must report to the commissioner in the form and manner determined by the commissioner the number of participants in the program and how grant funds were used. The commissioner must publish an annual report that identifies the grant recipients and summarizes how grant funds are used. Subd. 5. Special education teacher new text begin and related services provider new text end pathway program account. (a) An account is established in the special revenue fund known as the special education teachernew text begin and related services providernew text end pathway program account. (b) Funds appropriated for the special education teacher new text begin and related services provider new text end pathway program under this section must be transferred to the special deleted text begin educatordeleted text end new text begin educationnew text end teacher new text begin and related services provider new text end pathway program account in the special revenue fund. (c) Money in the account is annually appropriated to the commissioner for the special education teacher new text begin and related services provider new text end pathway program under this section. Any returned funds are available to be regranted. Grant recipients may apply to use grant money over a period of up to 60 months. (d) Up to $175,000 annually is appropriated to the commissioner for costs associated with administering and monitoring the program under this section. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end